Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.060

Enrollment data for computation of amounts due.

The student enrollment data necessary for the computation of the annual amounts due by nonhigh school districts pursuant to RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531 shall be established as follows:

(1) On or before July tenth preceding the school year, or such other date as may be established by the superintendent of public instruction, each high school district superintendent shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) The estimated number of students residing in a nonhigh school district that will be enrolled in the high school district during the school year which estimate has been mutually agreed upon by the high school district superintendent and the superintendent of each nonhigh school district in which one or more of such students resides;

(b) The total estimated number of kindergarten through twelfth grade annual average full-time equivalent students, inclusive of nonresident students, that will be enrolled in the high school district during the school year;

(c) The actual number of annual average full-time equivalent students provided for in subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this section that were enrolled in the high school district during the regular school term just completed; and

(d) The name, address, and the school district and county of residence of each student residing in a nonhigh school district reported pursuant to this subsection (1), to the extent the same can reasonably be established.

(2) In the event the superintendents of a high school district and a nonhigh school district are unable to reach agreement respecting the estimated number of annual average full-time equivalent students residing in the nonhigh school district that will be enrolled in the high school district during the school year, the estimate shall be established by the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 1990 c 33 s 490; 1981 c 264 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.44.180.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.